Idaho, session 2025, S1156.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-915, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-915. FIXED DISTRIBUTION -- SCHOOL MODERNIZATION FACILITIES
FUND. (1) The state department of education shall establish a fixed distri-
bution of funds to be made available for voluntary election to each school
district subject to the conditions in this section.
(a) The distribution shall be calculated in state fiscal year 2025 for
each school district, as defined in section 33-1001(21), Idaho Code,
that is in operation as of July 1, 2024.
(b) The distribution shall be calculated by multiplying the following
two (2) factors, both of which shall be based on the most recent data
available in the state fiscal year coinciding with the distribution
calculation:
(i) Calculate the per-pupil amount, using the average daily at-
tendance calculation provided in section 33-1003A, Idaho Code,
for each student in kindergarten through grade 12 at physical
facilities that are part of and on school grounds of the school
district in which the student is enrolled with verification, as
needed, by the office of the state board of education. Upon formal
approval by the state board of education, a school district may re-
ceive an exemption to the physical facility requirement pursuant
to this subsection if the student would have attended a physical
facility in the school district if not for a stated emergency; and
(ii) Calculate, together with the Idaho state building authority,
the total amount that a bond issuance would generate, based on the
amount established in section 63-3638(19), Idaho Code.
(c) In no case shall the amount awarded to any school district be less
than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) over the ten (10) year pe-
riod.
(d) In no case shall the amount awarded to any school district with an
active charter district maintenance and operation levy pursuant to sec-
tion 33-802(6), Idaho Code, or a charter district supplemental mainte-
nance and operation levy pursuant to section 33-802(4), Idaho Code, ex-
ceed forty million dollars ($40,000,000) over the ten (10) year period.
Excess funds shall be distributed proportionately according to the
factors established in paragraph (b) of this subsection to remaining
school districts that received initial allocations below forty million


dollars ($40,000,000). Any districts receiving reallocations under
this paragraph shall not exceed forty million dollars ($40,000,000).
(e) For the purposes of this section, the Idaho school for the deaf and
the blind shall be considered a school district and shall receive a dis-
tribution based on the average daily attendance of the school.
(f) A total of one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) shall be dis-
tributed by the state department of education in compliance with the
provisions of this subsection. Any additional available funds exceed-
ing one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) shall be distributed to school
districts with the greatest need based on the materials submitted to the
state department of education pursuant to sections 33-917 and 33-918,
Idaho Code, and as determined at the discretion of the state department
of education, provided that preference shall be given to rural school
districts as that term is defined in section 33-319, Idaho Code.
(2) The provisions of this section shall be null, void, and of no force
and effect on and after June 30, 2034.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.